Florida, session 2026, HB6525.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The City of Lakeland is authorized and directed
to appropriate from funds of the city not otherwise encumbered
and to draw a warrant in the sum of $312,500 payable to Reginald
Jackson as compensation for injuries and damages sustained.
Section 3. The amount paid by the City of Lakeland
pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded
under this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for
all present and future claims arising out of the factual
situation resulting in the shooting of Reginald Jackson as
described in this act. The total amount paid for attorney fees
relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the amount
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6525-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6525 2026
awarded under this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6525-00